apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="avvin/cere__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>si</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cevate</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ceste</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cevi</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cesti</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ser</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>sero</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ceremmo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>se</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cano</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>cesser</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cerei</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ciamo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ca</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cereste</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ceresti</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>cerebber</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cono</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cerebbero</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>te</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cerebbe</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ce</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ceremo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ti</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ta</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>to</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cessimo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cerò</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cessi</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cerete</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ceste</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cerai</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cessi</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ceran</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ceranno</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cerà</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cevamo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cemmo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cevo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cessero</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cete</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cesse</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ci</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ciamo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ca</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ciate</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>cevan</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ca</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cevano</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cendo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ceva</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>can</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ciamo</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>co</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cete</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ci</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>cer</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>con</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>cere</l>
	  <r>cere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bagarre__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l></l>
	  <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bass/ofondo__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ifondi</l>
	  <r>ofondo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ofondo</l>
	  <r>ofondo<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="belg/a__n">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>a</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>he</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>i</l>
	  <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="peseta"><i>peseta</i><par n="bagarre__n"/></e>
    <e lm="convincere"><i>convin</i><par n="avvin/cere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ritorcere"><i>ritor</i><par n="avvin/cere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="storcere"><i>stor</i><par n="avvin/cere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="torcere"><i>tor</i><par n="avvin/cere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="vincere"><i>vin</i><par n="avvin/cere__vblex"/></e>
